Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 5. Taxes and Assessments; Enforcement of Liens

Cross references. —

As to taxes and assessments in connection with water conservancy districts, see §§

41-3-770

through

41-3-779

.

As to assessments to connection with irrigation districts, see §§

41-7-401

through

41-7-415

.

As to assessments, etc., generally, in connection with drainage districts, see §§

41-9-240

through

41-9-259

.

§ 41-6-501.
“Land” defined.

The word “land”, as used in this act [§§

41-6-501

through

41-6-507

], shall be construed to mean town lots and any and all kinds of real property and premises, with the improvements thereon and the fixtures and appurtenances thereunto belonging.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 72, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 71-2205; W.S. 1957, § 41-262.

§ 41-6-502.
“Person” defined.

The word “person”, as used in this act [§§

41-6-501

through

41-6-507

], shall be construed to mean any person, corporation or copartnership, or any association owning land.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 72, § 6; C.S. 1945, § 71-2206; W.S. 1957, § 41-263.

§ 41-6-503.
Foreclosure of tax deeds; tax certificates as liens; actions to enforce generally; sale of lands generally.

Any person, drainage district or irrigation district holding a drainage or irrigation tax sale certificate of purchase or tax deed heretofore or hereafter issued for delinquent drainage or irrigation taxes and assessments legally levied and assessed, together with the penalty and costs due on the land described therein, shall have a lien on said land for such taxes, penalty and costs, and all subsequent taxes paid thereon by said person, drainage or irrigation district and those under whom he holds, with interest thereon, and all accruing penalties, and for the value of all improvements placed thereon by such lienholder while lawfully in possession of the premises, and those under whom the same is held, which lien shall be superior to any other lien, except that of subsequent taxes, and may be enforced by such lienholder by a civil action in the district court of the county wherein said land lies, or in any action in such court concerning said land in which such lienholder may be made a defendant; in which action every person having an interest in said land, as shown by the records in the office of the county clerk of said county, may be made a party; and all the proceedings in such action, so far as applicable and not inconsistent with the provisions of this act, shall be the same as provided by law, for the foreclosure of mortgages on real estate by action and sales thereunder; provided that the decree rendered in such action may contain the order of sale, directed to the sheriff of said county, commanding him to advertise and sell said lands without appraisement, and to make a return of his proceedings thereunder within sixty (60) days from the date thereof, which shall be sufficient authority for the sale of said land, and no other order of sale shall be necessary; and provided further, that any number of tracts of land belonging to any one (1) person upon which any one (1) lienholder shall have said lien, may be united in one (1) suit, in which suit each of said tracts of land shall bear its proportionate share of the cost of such suit, calculated upon the amount for which it shall sell. Provided further, that no such action shall be commenced on any drainage or irrigation district tax sale certificate within eighteen (18) months from the date of the sale mentioned herein.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 72, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-2201; W.S. 1957, § 41-264; Laws 2009, ch. 168, § 206.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “and ex officio register of deeds” following “county clerk” in the first sentence.

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Tax Sale Purchaser's Lien,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 275.

§ 41-6-504.
Foreclosure of tax deeds; joinder of defendants; pleading; decree; rights of assignee of tax deed.

When a drainage or irrigation district is the plaintiff in any suit brought under the provisions hereof, it may join all owners of real estate covered by its tax sale certificates of purchase or tax deeds as defendants, whether jointly or separately interested in the real estate, or any part thereof, and may unite in such action any persons having or claiming to have any interest in the real estate described in the petition. The defendants may plead jointly or separately to the petition and the court shall try and determine all issues between the plaintiff and each and all of the defendants, and shall, in its decree, ascertain and determine the amount of taxes, interest and costs chargeable to each particular tract or lot of real estate, and state the name or names of all defendants who have an interest in each tract or lot of real estate upon which the lien is fixed by its decree. The fact that the owners of separate or different lots of real estate are joined as defendants in one (1) action shall not constitute a defense on the part of any one (1) or more of the defendants, or misjoinder of defendants, or causes of action, and like rights shall be extended to any assignee of said drainage or irrigation district, tax certificate or tax deeds.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 72, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 71-2202; W.S. 1957, § 41-265.

§ 41-6-505.
Foreclosure of tax deeds; sale procedures generally; redemption.

In pursuance of said order of sale, whether contained in said decree or issued thereafter, the sheriff of said county shall immediately advertise the property for sale, and shall sell the same at public auction, without appraisement, to the highest bidder for cash, and shall make a return of his proceedings thereunder within sixty (60) days from the date thereof; and said lands shall be sold in tracts or parcels with reference to the rights of all parties therein, as the court in said order of sale may direct; at which sale said lienholder may bid as any other person, but, in the event of becoming the purchaser thereof, he shall not be required to pay any money, except such sum only as his bid may exceed the amount due him under said decree; and, upon confirmation of said sale by the court, the said sheriff shall execute a deed as nearly as may be in cases of mortgage foreclosure, conveying to the purchaser of said property, his heirs and assigns, all the right, title, estate, claim and interest, both at law and in equity, of all parties to said action in and to said land, subject only to subsequent taxes; and, upon request of the purchaser thereof, a writ of assistance shall issue to place said purchaser in possession of said land; provided, that any person having an interest in said land, may redeem the land in which he is interested at any time before the confirmation of such sale by the court, by paying into court a sum of money sufficient to discharge the lien thereon, for the use of the lienholder, and upon such terms as to the payment of the costs as the court may direct.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 72, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 71-2203; W.S. 1957, § 41-266.

§ 41-6-506.
Foreclosure of tax deeds; disposition of sale proceeds.

Upon the confirmation of such sale, the proceeds arising therefrom shall be delivered by the sheriff to the clerk of said court to be applied by him as follows:

To the payment of all costs of such action and sale, including an attorney fee to the lienholder’s attorney to be allowed by the court;

To the payment of all sums due the lienholder, including the value of all improvements placed on said land by said lienholder and those under whom he holds;

The balance, if any, to be paid to the prior owners of said land and those having an interest therein, as their interests may appear.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 72, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 71-2204; W.S. 1957, § 41-267.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 41-6-507.
Remedy cumulative.

The right and remedy herein provided for shall be cumulative and in addition to the right of any purchaser at tax sale to acquire tax deed in the manner and time now provided by law.

History.

Laws 1943, ch. 72, § 7; C.S. 1945, § 71-2207; W.S. 1957, § 41-268.

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1943, ch. 72, § 8, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.